New Jersey, session 222, A3594.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be known and may be cited as the New Jersey Housing Opportunity Act. 2.  a.  As used in this section, accessory dwelling unit means a residential dwelling unit that provides complete independent living facilities with a private entrance for one or more persons, consisting of provisions for living, sleeping, eating, sanitation, and cooking, including a stove and refrigerator, and is located within a proposed or existing primary dwelling, within an existing or proposed structure that is accessory to a dwelling on the same lot, constructed in whole or part as an extension to a proposed or existing primary dwelling, or constructed as a separate detached structure on the same lot as the existing or proposed primary dwelling. b.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, prior to the first day of the fourth month next following enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), a municipal governing body shall provide for at least one of the following in the municipalitys development regulations: (1)  set the minimum lot size for single-family residential development within a residential district at no more than one-quarter acre; (2)  permit development of a two-unit dwelling on each lot that is located within a single-family residential district; or (3)  permit development of an accessory dwelling unit on each lot that is located within a single-family residential district. c.  If a municipalitys development regulations are not consistent with subsection b. of this section after the first day of the fourth month next following enactment of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the municipalitys development regulations shall be interpreted and applied as providing for a minimum lot size for single-family residential development within a residential district at no more than one-quarter acre, consistent with paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section. d.  The provisions of this section shall not apply to: (1)  a dwelling located within a historic district; or (2)  a residential lot that is subject to a covenant or restriction, recorded prior to the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), requiring development of the lot in a different manner than set forth in subsection b. of this section. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.